Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 3. Disease Control Measures.
§ 32.1-45.2.
Public safety employees; testing for blood-borne pathogens; procedure available for certain citizens; definitions.

If, in the course of employment, an employee of a public safety agency is involved in a possible exposure prone incident, the employee shall immediately, or as soon thereafter as practicable, notify the agency of the incident in accordance with the agency’s procedures for reporting workplace accidents.

If, after reviewing the facts of the possible exposure prone incident with the employee and after medical consultation, the agency concludes that it is reasonable to believe that an exposure prone incident may have occurred, and the person whose body fluids were involved in the exposure prone incident is deceased, the agency shall (i) immediately contact the custodian of the remains and request that a specimen of blood be preserved for testing and (ii) contact the next of kin of the decedent and inform the next of kin that the specimen will be tested for hepatitis B or C viruses and human immunodeficiency virus and the results of such testing released to the person who was exposed.

If, after reviewing the facts of the possible exposure prone incident with the employee and after medical consultation, the agency concludes that it is reasonable to believe that an exposure prone incident may have occurred and the person whose body fluids were involved in the exposure prone incident is alive, the agency shall request the person whose body fluids were involved to submit to testing for hepatitis B or C virus and human immunodeficiency virus as provided in §

32.1-37.2

and to authorize disclosure of the test results.

If a person is involved in a possible exposure prone incident involving the body fluids of an employee of a public safety agency, the person may request the agency to review the facts of the possible exposure prone incident for purposes of obtaining the employee’s consent to test for hepatitis B or C virus and human immunodeficiency virus as provided in §

32.1-37.2

and to authorize disclosure of the test results. If, after reviewing the facts and after medical consultation, the agency concludes it is reasonable to believe an exposure prone incident involving the person and the employee may have occurred, (i) the agency shall request the employee whose body fluids were involved to give consent to submit to testing for hepatitis B or C virus and human immunodeficiency virus and to authorize disclosure of the test results or (ii) if the employee is deceased, the agency shall request the custodian of the remains to preserve a specimen of blood and shall request the decedent’s next of kin to provide consent, as provided in §

32.1-37.2

, to such testing and to authorize disclosure of the test results.

If consent is refused under subsection C, the public safety agency or the employee may petition the general district court of the city or county in which the person resides or resided, or in the case of a nonresident, the city or county of the public safety agency’s principal office, to determine whether an exposure prone incident has occurred and to order testing and disclosure of the test results.If consent is refused under subsection D, the person involved in the possible exposure prone incident may petition the general district court of the city or county of the public safety agency’s principal office to determine whether an exposure prone incident has occurred and to order testing and disclosure of the test results.

If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that an exposure prone incident has occurred, it shall order testing for hepatitis B or C virus and human immunodeficiency virus and disclosure of the test results. The court shall be advised by the Commissioner or his designee in making this finding. The hearing shall be held in camera as soon as practicable after the petition is filed. The record shall be sealed.

A party may appeal an order of the general district court to the circuit court of the same jurisdiction within ten days from the date of the order. Any such appeal shall be de novo, in camera, and shall be heard as soon as possible by the circuit court. The circuit court shall be advised by the Commissioner or his designee. The record shall be sealed. The order of the circuit court shall be final and nonappealable.

Disclosure of any test results provided by this section shall be made to the district health director of the jurisdiction in which the petition was brought or the district in which the person or employee was tested. The district health director or his designee shall inform the parties of the test results and counsel them in accordance with subsection B of §

32.1-37.2

.

The results of the tests shall be confidential as provided in §

32.1-36.1

.

No person known or suspected to be positive for infection with hepatitis B or C virus or human immunodeficiency virus shall be refused services for that reason by any public safety agency personnel.

For the purpose of this section and for no other purpose, the term “employee” shall include: (i) any person providing assistance to a person employed by a public safety agency who is directly affected by a possible exposure prone incident as a result of the specific crime or specific circumstances involved in the assistance and (ii) any victim of or witness to a crime who is directly affected by a possible exposure prone incident as a result of the specific crime.

This section shall not be deemed to create any duty on the part of any person where none exists otherwise, and a cause of action shall not arise from any failure to request consent or to consent to testing under this section. The remedies available under this section shall be exclusive.

For the purposes of this section:“Exposure prone incident” means a direct exposure to body fluids of another person in a manner which may, according to the then current guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, transmit hepatitis B or C virus or human immunodeficiency virus and which occurred during the commission of a criminal act, during the performance of emergency procedures, care or assistance, or in the course of public safety or law-enforcement duties.“Public safety agency” means any sheriff’s office; any adult or youth correctional, law-enforcement, or fire safety organization; the Department of Forensic Science; or any agency or department that employs persons who have law-enforcement authority and which is under the direction and control of the Commonwealth or any local governing body.

History.

1992, c. 711; 1994, c. 146; 1997, cc. 722, 804; 2008, c. 641; 2014, c. 275; 2020, c. 502.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 362, cl. 1 provides: “That the Secretaries of Health and Human Resources and Public Safety and Homeland Security (the Secretaries) shall establish a work group to develop a plan to improve the Commonwealth’s response to exposure-prone incidents involving employees of law-enforcement agencies, volunteers and employees of fire departments and companies, and volunteers and employees of emergency medical services agencies and other appropriate entities. The work group shall include (i) the Superintendent of State Police, the Commissioner of Health, the Executive Director of the Department of Fire Programs, and the Director of the Department of General Services, or their designees; (ii) representatives of local law-enforcement agencies, fire departments and companies, and emergency medical services agencies; (iii) representatives of organizations representing law-enforcement officers, salaried and volunteer firefighters, and salaried and volunteer emergency medical services providers; and (iv) such other stakeholders as the Secretaries shall deem appropriate.

“In conducting its work, the work group shall:

“1. Develop a plan for the establishment of an entity to assist with the management of exposure-prone incidents involving employees of law-enforcement agencies, volunteers and employees of fire departments and companies, and volunteers and employees of emergency medical services agencies and other appropriate entities. Such assistance shall include assistance with (i) the process of confirming whether a volunteer or employee has been involved in an exposure-prone incident and, as a result of such exposure-prone incident, has been exposed to the body fluids of another person in a manner that may, according to the then-current guidelines of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, transmit human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses; (ii) coordinating the process by which specimens of a person’s body fluids are collected and tested to determine whether the person was infected with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses; and (iii) coordinating the care and treatment of a volunteer or employee for whom post-exposure prophylactic treatment or other treatment is required. Such entity shall also be charged with (a) providing training and education to designated infection control officers and others on topics related to preventing exposure-prone incidents, identifying and responding to exposure-prone incidents, and treatment and follow-up care for volunteers and employees involved in exposure-prone incidents and (b) collecting data from law-enforcement agencies, fire departments and companies, emergency medical services agencies, and others regarding the number of requests for assistance in determining whether an exposure-prone incident has occurred, the number of confirmed exposure-prone incidents, the number of cases involving an exposure-prone incident in which a specimen was collected and tested and whether the person from whom such specimen was collected was deceased or living, the number of cases in which post-exposure prophylaxis was required, and, in cases in which post-exposure prophylaxis was required, the duration and cost of such treatment. In developing the plan, the work group shall evaluate and provide recommendations related to the appropriate state agency or body to operate or provide oversight of the entity, the structure and organization of the entity, the specific powers and duties of the entity, and the cost to establish the entity. The work group shall also provide specific recommendations for legislative, regulatory, or budgetary actions necessary to establish the entity; and

“2. Study and develop recommendations related to developing the ability to perform postmortem testing for infection with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses through the Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services. Such study shall include analysis of (i) the steps necessary to implement postmortem testing for infection with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses using a screening assay that is licensed for such purpose by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, (ii) the potential cost to the Commonwealth of developing the ability to perform postmortem testing for infection with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses using a screening assay that is licensed for such purpose by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration through the Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services, and (iii) any potential savings to the Commonwealth resulting from implementing postmortem testing for infection with human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis B or C viruses using a screening assay that is licensed for such purpose by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration through the Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services.

“The work group shall report its findings, conclusions, and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly by December 1, 2020.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 641, in subsection B, deleted “give informed consent, as provided in §

32.1-37.2

, to” following “fluids were involved to” and inserted “as provided in §

32.1-37.2

” in clause (i), deleted “provide informed” following “next of kin to” in clause (ii); in subsection C, substituted “employee’s consent” for “employee’s informed consent, as provided in § 32.1-37.2,” inserted “as provided in § 32.1-37.2,” deleted “informed” following “involved to give” and “kin to provide”; and in subsection D, deleted “informed” preceding “consent is refused” near the beginning of both paragraphs.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 275, in subsection L, in the definition of “Public safety agency” deleted “and” following “sheriff’s office” and inserted “the Department of Forensic Science.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 502, rewrote former subsection B as current subsections B and C, with former subsection B having read, “If, after reviewing the facts of the possible exposure prone incident with the employee and after medical consultation, the agency concludes that it is reasonable to believe that an exposure prone incident may have occurred, (i) the agency shall request the person whose body fluids were involved to submit to testing for hepatitis B or C virus and human immunodeficiency virus as provided in §

32.1-37.2

and to authorize disclosure of the test results or (ii) if the person is deceased, the agency shall request the custodian of the remains to preserve a specimen of blood and shall request the decedent’s next of kin to consent, as provided in §

32.1-37.2

, to such testing and to authorize disclosure of the test results”; redesignated subsections C through L as subsections D through M; updated internal references; in subsection H, substituted “subsection C” for “subsection B” in the second sentence; and in subsection M, deleted “the following terms shall apply” at the end of the introductory language.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-758 Petition to Test for Blood-Borne Pathogens.

§ 32.1-45.3.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 301, cl. 1.

Editor’s note.

Former §

32.1-45.3

, pertaining to required testing of gamete donors and the establishment of
testing protocol by the Board, derived from 1995, c. 519.

§ 32.1-45.4.
Comprehensive harm reduction programs.

The Commissioner or his designee may authorize the director of a local department of health, or any other organization that promotes scientifically proven methods of mitigating health risks associated with drug use and other high-risk behaviors, to establish and operate local or regional comprehensive harm reduction programs that include the provision of sterile hypodermic needles and syringes and disposal of used hypodermic needles and syringes. The objectives of such programs shall be to (i) reduce the spread of HIV, viral hepatitis, and other blood-borne diseases in the Commonwealth; (ii) reduce the transmission of blood-borne diseases through needlestick injuries to law-enforcement and other emergency personnel; (iii) provide information to individuals who inject drugs regarding addiction recovery treatment services and encourage such individuals to participate in evidence-based substance use treatment programs; (iv) prevent opioid overdose deaths through distribution of naloxone or other opioid antagonists; and (v) incentivize the safe return and disposal of hypodermic needles and syringes. Comprehensive harm reduction programs established by the Commissioner pursuant to this section shall be operated by local health departments or affiliated organizations with which the Department contracts.

A comprehensive harm reduction program established pursuant to this section shall include (i) the disposal of used hypodermic needles and syringes; (ii) the provision of hypodermic needles and syringes and other injection supplies at no cost and in quantities sufficient to ensure that needles, hypodermic syringes, and other injection supplies are not shared or reused; (iii) reasonable and adequate security of program sites, equipment, and personnel; (iv) the provision of educational materials concerning (a) substance use disorder prevention, (b) overdose prevention, (c) the prevention of transmission of HIV, viral hepatitis, and other blood-borne diseases, (d) available mental health treatment options, including referrals for mental health treatment, and (e) available substance use disorder treatment options, which shall include options for medication assisted treatment of substance use disorder, including referrals for treatment; (v) access to overdose prevention kits that contain naloxone or other opioid antagonist approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration for opioid overdose reversal; (vi) individual harm reduction counseling, including individual consultations regarding appropriate mental health or substance use disorder treatment; and (vii) verification that a hypodermic needle or syringe or other injection supplies were obtained from a comprehensive harm reduction program established pursuant to this section.

The director of a local health department or representative of any other organization authorized to establish a comprehensive harm reduction program pursuant to this section shall notify the Department, in a manner and form specified by the Department, of his intent to establish a comprehensive harm reduction program. Such notice shall include (i) the name of the local health department or organization that will operate the comprehensive harm reduction program, (ii) a description of the geographic area and population to be served by the comprehensive harm reduction program, and (iii) a description of the methods by which the comprehensive harm reduction program will comply with the requirements of subsection B, including a written security plan that provides for the reasonable and adequate security of the comprehensive harm reduction program site, equipment, and personnel.

Written security plans required pursuant to clause (iii) of subsection C shall be filed annually with each local law-enforcement agency serving the jurisdiction in which the comprehensive harm reduction program is located for their consideration.

The provisions of §§

18.2-250

,

18.2-265.3

, and 54.1-3466 shall not apply to a person who dispenses or distributes hypodermic needles and syringes as part of a comprehensive harm reduction program established pursuant to this section.

The provisions of §§

18.2-250

,

18.2-265.3

, and 54.1-3466 relating to possession of a controlled substance, drug paraphernalia, and controlled paraphernalia shall not apply to any person acting on behalf or for the benefit of a comprehensive harm reduction program when such possession is incidental to the provision of services as part of a comprehensive harm reduction program established pursuant to this section.

The provisions of §§

18.2-250

,

18.2-265.3

, and 54.1-3466 relating to possession of a controlled substance, drug paraphernalia, and controlled paraphernalia shall not apply to any person receiving services from a comprehensive harm reduction program established pursuant to this section, when (i) such controlled substance is a residual amount contained in a used needle, used hypodermic syringe, or used injection supplies obtained from or returned to a comprehensive harm reduction program established pursuant to this section, or (ii) such paraphernalia is obtained from a comprehensive harm reduction program established pursuant to this section, as evidenced by the verification required pursuant to clause (vii) of subsection B.

Every local health department or other organization operating a comprehensive harm reduction program pursuant to this section shall report annually by July 1 to the Department regarding, for the previous calendar year, (i) the number of individuals served by the comprehensive harm reduction program; (ii) the number of needles, hypodermic syringes, and other injection supplies distributed by the comprehensive harm reduction program; (iii) the number of overdose prevention kits described in clause (v) of subsection B distributed by the comprehensive harm reduction program; and (iv) the number and type of referrals to mental health or substance use disorder treatment services provided to individuals served by the comprehensive harm reduction program, including the number of individuals referred to programs that provide naloxone or other opioid antagonists approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration for opioid overdose reversal.

Except in the case of a comprehensive harm reduction program established by the Commissioner, no state funds shall be used to purchase needles or hypodermic syringes distributed by a comprehensive harm reduction program established pursuant to this section.

History.

2017, c. 183; 2020, c. 839.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 183, cl. 2 provides: “That the Virginia Department of Health shall submit, to the Governor and to the General Assembly, a progress report concerning any program established pursuant to this act by October 1, 2018, and a report evaluating the effectiveness of any program established pursuant to this act by October 1, 2019.”

Acts 2017, c. 183, cl. 3, which would have made this section expire July 1, 2020, was repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 212 and 303, cl. 1, and Acts 2020, c. 839, cl. 2.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 839 rewrote the section.

§ 32.1-46.
Immunization of patients against certain diseases.

The parent, guardian or person standing in loco parentis of each child within this Commonwealth shall cause such child to be immunized in accordance with the Immunization Schedule developed and published by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP), the American Academy of Pediatrics (AAP), and the American Academy of Family Physicians (AAFP). The required immunizations for attendance at a public or private elementary, middle or secondary school, child care center, nursery school, family day care home, or developmental center shall be those set forth in the State Board of Health Regulations for the Immunization of School Children. The Board’s regulations shall at a minimum require:

A minimum of three properly spaced doses of hepatitis B vaccine (HepB).

A minimum of three or more properly spaced doses of diphtheria toxoid. One dose shall be administered on or after the fourth birthday.

A minimum of three or more properly spaced doses of tetanus toxoid. One dose shall be administered on or after the fourth birthday.

A minimum of three or more properly spaced doses of acellular pertussis vaccine. One dose shall be administered on or after the fourth birthday. A booster dose shall be administered prior to entry into the seventh grade.

Two or three primary doses of Haemophilus influenzae type b (Hib) vaccine, depending on the manufacturer, for children up to 60 months of age.

Two properly spaced doses of live attenuated measles (rubeola) vaccine. The first dose shall be administered at age 12 months or older.

One dose of live attenuated rubella vaccine shall be administered at age 12 months or older.

One dose of live attenuated mumps vaccine shall be administered at age 12 months or older.

Two properly spaced doses of varicella vaccine. The first dose shall be administered at age 12 months or older.

Three or more properly spaced doses of oral polio vaccine (OPV) or inactivated polio vaccine (IPV). One dose shall be administered on or after the fourth birthday. A fourth dose shall be required if the three dose primary series consisted of a combination of OPV and IPV.

One to four doses, dependent on age at first dose, of properly spaced pneumococcal conjugate (PCV) vaccine for children up to 60 months of age.

Two doses of properly spaced human papillomavirus (HPV) vaccine. The first dose shall be administered before the child enters the seventh grade.

Two or three properly spaced doses of rotavirus vaccine, depending on the manufacturer, for children up to eight months of age.

Two properly spaced doses of hepatitis A vaccine (HAV). The first dose shall be administered at age 12 months or older.

Two properly spaced doses of meningococcal conjugate vaccine (MenACWY). The first dose shall be administered prior to entry to seventh grade. The second dose shall be administered prior to entry to twelfth grade.The parent, guardian or person standing in loco parentis may have such child immunized by a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse, or a pharmacist who administers pursuant to a valid prescription, or may present the child to the appropriate local health department, which shall administer the vaccines required by the State Board of Health Regulations for the Immunization of School Children without charge to the parent of or person standing in loco parentis to the child if (i) the child is eligible for the Vaccines for Children Program or (ii) the child is eligible for coverages issued pursuant to Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq. (Medicare), Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq. (Medicaid), Title XXI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq. (CHIP), or 10 U.S.C. § 1071 et seq. (CHAMPUS). In all cases in which a child is covered by a health carrier, Medicare, Medicaid, CHIP, or CHAMPUS, the Department shall seek reimbursement from the health carrier, Medicare, Medicaid, CHIP, or CHAMPUS for all allowable costs associated with the provision of the vaccine. For the purposes of this section, the Department shall be deemed a participating provider with a managed care health insurance plan as defined in §

32.1-137.1

.

A physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, pharmacist, or local health department administering a vaccine required by this section shall provide to the person who presents the child for immunizations a certificate that shall state the diseases for which the child has been immunized, the numbers of doses given, the dates when administered and any further immunizations indicated.

The vaccines required by this section shall meet the standards prescribed in, and be administered in accordance with, the State Board of Health Regulations for the Immunization of School Children. The State Board of Health shall amend the State Board of Health Regulations for the Immunization of School Children as necessary from time to time to maintain conformity with evidence-based, routinely recommended vaccinations for children. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action and (ii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.

The provisions of this section shall not apply if:

The parent or guardian of the child objects thereto on the grounds that the administration of immunizing agents conflicts with his religious tenets or practices, unless an emergency or epidemic of disease has been declared by the Board;

The parent or guardian presents a statement from a physician licensed to practice medicine in Virginia, a licensed nurse practitioner, or a local health department that states that the physical condition of the child is such that the administration of one or more of the required immunizing agents would be detrimental to the health of the child; or

Because the human papillomavirus is not communicable in a school setting, a parent or guardian, at the parent’s or guardian’s sole discretion, may elect for the parent’s or guardian’s child not to receive the human papillomavirus vaccine, after having reviewed materials describing the link between the human papillomavirus and cervical cancer approved for such use by the Board.

For the purpose of protecting the public health by ensuring that each child receives age-appropriate immunizations, any physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, licensed institutional health care provider, local or district health department, the Virginia Immunization Information System, and the Department of Health may share immunization and patient locator information without parental authorization, including, but not limited to, the month, day, and year of each administered immunization; the patient’s name, address, telephone number, birth date, and social security number; and the parents’ names. The immunization information; the patient’s name, address, telephone number, birth date, and social security number; and the parents’ names shall be confidential and shall only be shared for the purposes set out in this subsection.

The State Board of Health shall review this section annually and make recommendations for revision by September 1 to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Joint Commission on Health Care.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-57.1; 1968, c. 592; 1972, c. 558; 1979, c. 711; 1980, c. 410; 1989, c. 382; 1991, c. 133; 1992, cc. 127, 166; 1994, c. 62; 1995, cc. 729, 742; 1996, cc. 67, 533; 1999, cc. 632, 676, 738; 2000, c. 476; 2004, c. 855; 2005, cc. 643, 684; 2006, cc. 364, 396, 716; 2007, cc. 858, 922; 2011, c. 125; 2014, cc. 316, 344; 2016, c. 81; 2019, c. 222; 2020, c. 1223.

Cross references.

As to requirement of proof of childhood immunizations for children eligible for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families, and sanction for noncompliance, see §

63.2-603

.

As to requirement that child day care centers operated by religious institutions that are exempt from licensure are in compliance with §

32.1-46

regarding childhood immunization, see §

63.2-1716

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2004, c. 855, cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall take effect 60 days following the effective date of the regulations promulgated by the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing required by the third enactment clause of this act.” Emergency regulations were effective July 15, 2004.

Acts
2004, c. 855, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Medicine and Board of Nursing shall amend regulations governing the licensure of nurse practitioners to be effective within 280 days of enactment of this act. Such amendments shall require inclusion of the nurse practitioner’s authority for signatures, certifications, stamps, verifications, affidavits and endorsements in the written protocol between the supervising physician and the nurse practitioner.”

Acts
2006, c. 364, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriations act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.” Funding was provided; see Acts
2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

Acts
2006, c. 716, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriations act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.” Funding was provided; see Acts
2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

Acts
2020, c. 1223, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Health and the Department of Education shall jointly review
§§ 22.1-271.2 and

32.1-46

of the Code of Virginia and report to the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Education and Health on the effectiveness of the required vaccination program in promoting public health by December 1, 2021.”

Acts
2020, c. 1223, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 476 inserted “or registered nurse” in the second paragraph of subsection A and inserted “registered nurse” near the beginning of subsection B.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 855, in subsection A, substituted “30 months” for “thirty months” and “12 months” for “twelve months”; substituted “that shall state” for “which shall state” in subdivision B; substituted “or a licensed nurse practitioner, that” for “which” in subdivision D 2; and inserted “nurse practitioner” following “any physician” in subsection E. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 643 and 684 are identical, and in subsection E, inserted “the Virginia Immunization Information System”
preceding “and the Department of Health,” “without parental authorization” preceding “including, but not limited to,” substituted “patient” for “child,” and “patient’s” for “child’s” two times.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 364, in subsection A, inserted “and a booster dose of tetanus toxoid, reduced diphtheria toxoid, and acellular pertussis (Tdap)” in the third sentence, and added the fifth sentence. See Editor’s note.

The 2006 amendment by c. 396 inserted “physician assistant” in the first sentence in subsection E.

The 2006 amendment by c. 716, in subsection A, rewrote the first paragraph, inserted subdivisions A 1 to A 11, and substituted “the vaccines required by the State Board of Health Regulations for the Immunization of School Childen” for “the required vaccines” in the last paragraph; and added subsection F. See Editor’s note.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 858 and 922, effective October 1, 2008, are nearly identical, and inserted A 12 and D 3.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 125, in subdivision D 2, inserted “or a local health department” and made a related change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 316, in the paragraph following subdivision A 12, added the language beginning “to the parent of or person” at the end of the first sentence, and added the last two sentences.

The 2014 amendment by c. 344 deleted the last sentence in subdivision A 2, which read “A booster dose shall be administered prior to entering the sixth grade if at least five years have passed since the last dose of diphtheria toxoid”; deleted the last sentence in subdivision A 3, which read “A booster dose of Tdap vaccine shall be administered prior to entering the sixth grade if at least five years have passed since the last dose of tetanus toxoid”; deleted “if at least five years have passed since the last dose of pertussis vaccine” at the end of subdivision A 4; deleted “susceptible” following “All” in subdivision A 9; and in subdivision A 11, substituted “One” for “Two,” “(PCV)” for “(PVC),” “up to 60 months” for “less than two years,” and deleted “7-valent” following “pneumococcal.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 81, in subdivision A 12, substituted “physician assistant, nurse practitioner, registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse, or a pharmacist who administers pursuant to a valid prescription” for “or registered nurse”; in subsection B, inserted “physician assistant, nurse practitioner,” and “licensed practical nurse, pharmacist.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 222 substituted “seventh grade” for “sixth grade” in subdivision A 4.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1223, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subdivision A 9, which formerly read: “All children born on and after January 1, 1997, shall be required to have one dose of varicella vaccine on or after 12 months”; in subdivision A 12, in the first sentence, substituted “Two doses” for “Three doses” and deleted “for females” at the end, and substituted “seventh grade” for “sixth grade” in the second sentence; added subdivisions A 13 through A 15; and in subsection C, substituted “the State Board of Health Regulations for the Immunization of School Children” for “regulations of the Board” in the first sentence and added the second through fourth sentences.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 301 (1980).

For a note, “A One Shot Deal: The National Childhood Vaccine Injury Act,” see 41 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 309 (1999).

For 2006 survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2006).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 417 (2007).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 81.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Data related to COVID-19 pandemic. —

Dissemination of data related to the COVID-19 pandemic by the Virginia Department of Health is permitted, and in some cases required, as set forth in Virginia Code §

32.1-37.01

and Acts 2020 Spec. Sess. I, c. 13, provided the release of such information preserves patient and practitioner anonymity pursuant to §

32.1-41

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Emmett W. Hanger, Jr. Member, Senate of Virginia, 21-032, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 9 (2/26/21).